Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin HUMAN SERVICES FORECAST ADJUSTMENTS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are added to or, if shown in parentheses, subtracted from the appropriations in Laws 2023, chapter 61, article 9, and Laws 2023, chapter 70, article 20, as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 115, article 21, and Laws 2024, chapter 127, articles 53 and 67, to the commissioner of human services from the general fund or other named fund for the purposes specified in section 2 and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figure "2025" used in this act means that the addition to or subtraction from the appropriation listed under it is available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2025 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin COMMISSIONER OF HUMAN SERVICESnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 137,099,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin General Fund new text end new text begin 153,281,000 new text end new text begin Health Care Access Fund new text end new text begin (16,182,000) new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Forecasted Programs new text end new text begin (a) General Assistance new text end new text begin 3,737,000 new text end new text begin (b) Minnesota Supplemental Aid new text end new text begin 3,428,000 new text end new text begin (c) Housing Support new text end new text begin 11,923,000 new text end new text begin (d) MinnesotaCare new text end new text begin (16,182,000) new text end new text begin This appropriation is from the health care access fund. new text end new text begin (e) Medical Assistance new text end new text begin (1,735,000) new text end new text begin (f) Behavioral Health Fund new text end new text begin 135,928,000 new text end Sec. 3. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 and 2 are effective the day following final enactment. new text end